Utah statutes.
59-7-519.   Period of limitation for making assessments -- Change,
correction, or amendment of federal income tax -- Duty of corporation to
notify state -- Extensions.
(1) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, the amount of taxes
imposed by this chapter shall be assessed within three years after a return is
filed.
(b)  After the expiration of the time period described in Subsection (1)(a), a
proceeding in court may not be made without assessment for the collection of
the taxes described in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  In the case of a deficiency attributable to the application of a net loss
carryback, the deficiency may be assessed at any time before the expiration of
the period within which a deficiency for the taxable year of the net loss that
results in the carryback may be assessed.
(3)  If the amount of federal taxable income for any year of any corporation
as returned to the United States treasury department is changed or corrected
by the commissioner of internal revenue or other officer of the United States
or other competent authority, or where a renegotiation of a contract or
subcontract with the United States results in a change of federal taxable
income, a taxpayer shall:
(a)  report the change or corrected net income within 90 days after the final
determination of the change or correction as required to the commission; and
(b)  concede the accuracy of the determination or state where the
determination is erroneous.
(4)  Any corporation filing an amended return with the United States treasury
department shall also file, within 90 days after the corporation files the
amended return with the United States treasury department, an amended return
with the commission that contains the information the commission requires.
(5)  If a corporation fails to report a change or correction by the
commissioner of internal revenue, other officer of the United States, or other
competent authority or fails to file an amended return, any deficiency
resulting from the change or correction may be assessed and collected within
three years after the change, correction, or amended return is reported to or
filed with the federal government.
(6)  If any corporation agrees with the commissioner of internal revenue for
an extension, or a renewal of an extension, of the period for proposing and
assessing deficiencies in federal income tax for any year, the period for
sending a notice of proposed Utah tax deficiencies for that year is the later
of:
(a)  three years after the return is filed; or
(b)  six months after the date of the expiration of the agreed period for
assessing deficiencies in federal income tax.
(7)  The extensions described in Section 59-1-1418 apply to this section.
